Utah statutes.
17B-2a-104.   Cemetery maintenance district bonding authority.

A cemetery maintenance district may issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

